District of Columbia statutes.
2-1608

Transition provisions.

All employees of the Legal Aid Agency for the District of Columbia on the date of enactment of this chapter shall be deemed to be employees of the Service and shall be entitled to the same compensation and benefits as they are entitled to as employees of the Legal Aid Agency for the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, Pub. L. 91-358, title III, § 308

Cross References

Education Licensure Commission, powers and duties, see § 38-1307.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2708.
1973 Ed., § 2-2228.